Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB48.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 327 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
The General Assembly finds and declares that:
(1) The practice of physical therapy should be regulated and controlled by this chapter and administrative
regulations promulgated thereunder in order to protect and safeguard the health and safety of the citizens
of the Commonwealth of Kentucky; and
(2) Each individual licensed or privileged under this chapter shall be responsible and accountable for making
decisions that are based upon the individual's educational preparation and experience in physical therapy
and shall practice physical therapy with reasonable skill and safety.
SECTION 2. KRS 327.010 IS REPEALED AND REENACTED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Active patient" means a person who is or has been under a physical therapy plan of care unless care is
transferred or terminated in writing;
(2) "Board" means the Board of Physical Therapy established in Section 5 of this Act;
(3) "Physical therapist" means a professional person who has met the educational requirements of this chapter
and is licensed to practice physical therapy pursuant to this chapter;
(4) "Physical therapist assistant" means a person who is licensed pursuant to this chapter and provides
physical therapy services under the direction and supervision of a licensed physical therapist;
(5) (a) "Physical therapy" means the use of selected knowledge and skills in planning, organizing, and
directing programs for the care of individuals whose ability to function is impaired or threatened by
disease or injury, which encompasses preventive measures, screening, tests in aid of diagnosis and
evaluation, and invasive or noninvasive procedures with emphasis on the skeletal system,
integumentary system, and neuromuscular and cardiopulmonary function, as it relates to physical
therapy.
(b) "Physical therapy" also includes:
1. Screening or evaluations performed to determine the degree of impairment of relevant aspects
such as but not limited to nerve and muscle function, including subcutaneous bioelectrical
potentials, motor development, functional capacity, and respiratory or circulatory efficiency;
and
2. Physical therapy treatment, which includes but is not limited to:
a. Physical therapy treatment performed upon referral by a licensed doctor of medicine,
osteopathy, dentistry, chiropractic, or podiatry;
b. Exercises for increasing or restoring strength, endurance, coordination, and range of
motion;
c. Stimuli to facilitate motor activity and learning;
d. Instruction in activities of daily living; and
e. The use of assistive devices and the application of physical agents to relieve pain or
alter physiological status.
(c) "Physical therapy" does not include the use of:
1. Roentgen rays and radium for diagnostic or therapeutic purposes; or
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
2. Electricity for surgical purposes, including cauterization and colonic irrigations;
which are not authorized as physical therapy in this chapter;
(6) "Provisional license" means a license granted by the board to an applicant who has not yet successfully
completed the board-approved examination; and
(7) "Refer" or "referral" means the procedure by which a licensed health care provider designates the
initiation of physical therapy treatment by a licensed physical therapist.
Section 3. KRS 327.020 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A[No] person shall not practice, work, or hold himself or herself out as being able to practice physical therapy
or work as a physical therapist assistant unless the person:
(a) 1. Meets the educational requirements of this chapter;
2. Is licensed in accordance with the provisions of this chapter;
3. Is in good standing with the board; and
4. Holds a license that is not suspended or revoked; or
(b) Is eligible to practice or work through a compact privilege granted under KRS 327.300.
(2) [Nothing contained in ]This chapter shall not be construed to:
(a) Prohibit any person licensed in this state under any other law from engaging in the practice for which
that person is duly licensed;[. Nothing contained in this chapter shall ]
(b) Prohibit routine and restorative services performed by personnel employed by hospitals, physicians, or
licensed health care facilities as relates to physical therapists;[. This chapter does not ]
(c) Preclude certified occupational therapists, respiratory technicians, or respiratory therapists from
practicing as defined in the United States Department of Health, Education and Welfare, Public Health
Service, Health Resources Administration, Bureau of Health Manpower, DHEW publication No.
(HRA) 80-28, "A Report On Allied Health Personnel[.]"; or
(d) Affect or prevent:
1. A physical therapist student from engaging in clinical practice under the supervision of a
licensed physical therapist, as part of the student's educational program;
2. A physical therapist assistant student from engaging in clinical practice under the supervision
of a licensed physical therapist or of a physical therapist assistant consistent with
administrative regulations promulgated by the board, as part of the student's educational
program;
3. A physical therapist or a physical therapist assistant who is licensed to practice in another
state or country from conducting or participating in a clinical residency under the supervision
of a physical therapist licensed in Kentucky and for a period of not more than ninety (90)
days;
4. A physical therapist or a physical therapist assistant who is licensed to practice in another
state or country from conducting or participating in the teaching of physical therapy in
connection with an educational program and for a period of not more than ninety (90) days;
5. A physical therapist or a physical therapist assistant licensed in another state or country from
performing physical therapy on members of an out-of-state sports or entertainment group they
accompany to Kentucky;
6. The practice of chiropractic as defined in KRS 312.015;
7. The practice of occupational therapy as defined in KRS 319A.010; or
8. a. A physical therapist or a physical therapist assistant who is practicing in the Armed
Forces of the United States, United States Public Health Service, or United States
Department of Veterans Affairs pursuant to federal regulations for jurisdictional
licensure of healthcare providers.

CHAPTER 36 3
b. If a person described in subdivision a. of this subparagraph engages in the practice of
physical therapy outside the course and scope of his or her federal employment as a
physical therapist or a physical therapist assistant, he or she shall then be required to
obtain a license in accordance with this chapter and administrative regulations
promulgated by the board[ Persons regularly employed by the United States shall be
exempted from the provisions of this chapter while engaged in this employment].
(3) A licensed physical therapist may hold himself or herself out as a "physical therapist" or "licensed physical
therapist" and may use the abbreviations "P.T." or "L.P.T." as a part of or immediately following the physical
therapist's name, in connection with the physical therapist's[his or her] profession.
(4) A licensed physical therapist assistant may hold himself or herself out as a "physical therapist assistant" or
"licensed physical therapist assistant" and may use the abbreviations "P.T.A." or "L.P.T.A." as a part of
or immediately following the physical therapist assistant's name, in connection with the physical therapist
assistant's profession.
(5) It shall be unlawful for any person, or for any business entity, its employees, agents, or representatives to use
in connection with the person's or entity's name or business activity the words "physical therapy," "physical
therapist," "physiotherapy," "physiotherapist," "registered physical therapist," the letters "P.T.," "L.P.T.," or
any other words, letters, abbreviations, or insignia indicating or implying directly or indirectly that physical
therapy is provided or supplied or to bill for physical therapy unless that physical therapy is provided by or
under the supervision of a physical therapist licensed and practicing in accordance with this chapter.
(6)[(5)] The provisions of subsections (1), (2), and (5)[(4)] of this section shall not apply to volunteer health
practitioners providing services under KRS 39A.350 to 39A.366.
Section 4. KRS 327.025 is amended to read as follows:
Any physical therapist, physical therapist[therapist's] assistant, or employer of physical therapy practitioners having
knowledge of facts by actual or direct knowledge shall report to the board [of physical therapy ]a physical therapist or
physical therapist[therapist's] assistant who:
(1) Has been convicted of any[a] felony, or of a misdemeanor as referenced by subsection (2)(f) of Section 10 of
this Act that involved acts that bear directly on the qualifications or ability of the applicant or[,] licensee[, or
certificate holder] to practice physical therapy;
(2) Is suspected of fraud or deceit in procuring or attempting to procure a license to practice physical therapy or of
negligently performing actions that justify action against a physical therapist or physical therapist[therapist's]
assistant's license as identified in KRS 327.070(2);
(3) Has had a license to practice as a physical therapist or a license[certificate] to work as a physical
therapist[therapist's] assistant denied, limited, suspended, probated, or revoked in another jurisdiction on
grounds sufficient to cause a license [or certificate ]to be denied, limited, suspended, probated, or revoked in
this Commonwealth; or
(4) Is practicing physical therapy without a current active license, compact privilege[certificate], or valid
provisional license[temporary permit] issued by the board.
Section 5. KRS 327.030 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby established a Board of Physical Therapy which shall consist of seven (7) members who shall
be appointed by the Governor as follows:[.]
(a)[(1)] One (1) board member shall be a resident of Kentucky who is not affiliated with or does not have
more than five percent (5%) financial interest in any health care profession or business; and[.]
(b)[(2)] All other board members shall:
1.[(a)] Be residents of Kentucky;
2.[(b)] Have engaged in the practice of physical therapy in Kentucky for the past five (5) years; and
3.[(c)] Not have been disciplined by the board, or have been under any disciplinary action, in the past
five (5)[two (2)] years.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(2)[(3)] All vacancies shall be filled by the Governor from a list of at least three (3) persons [per position
]submitted by the American[Kentucky] Physical Therapy Association Kentucky Chapter or as provided by
KRS 12.070.
(3)[(4)] Appointments[For appointments] to the board [after December 31, 2008, the first two (2) appointments
shall be for a term of two (2) years. The third appointment shall be for a term of three (3) years. All other
subsequent appointments ]shall be for a term of four (4) years. All members shall serve until their successors
are appointed and qualify. No member shall serve for more than two (2) consecutive terms.
(4)[(5)] The Governor may remove any member of the board for misconduct, incompetence, or neglect of duty.
(5)[(6)] The board may request the removal of a board member by the Governor.
(6)[(7)] The board shall annually elect a chair and chair-elect.
(7)[(8)] The board shall provide orientation to all new board members regarding the duties of the board.
(8) The board may employ an executive director and other personnel and may purchase materials and supplies
it deems necessary for the proper discharge of its duties.
(9) There shall be no liability on the part of, and no action for damages against, any current or former board
member, representative, agent, or employee of the board, when the person is functioning within the scope of
board duties, acting without malice and with the reasonable belief that the actions taken by him or her are
warranted by law.
(10) The board may purchase professional liability insurance for its members, staff, investigators, general
counsel, consultants, agents, and employees. The purchase of or failure to purchase insurance shall not be
deemed a waiver of any immunity already conferred on the board, its members, staff, investigators, general
counsel, consultants, agents, and employees.
(11)[(10)] Each board member shall receive, in addition to travel, lodging, and other actual and necessary
expenses, a per diem not to exceed two hundred fifty[one hundred twenty] dollars ($250)[($120)] for each day
the member is actually engaged in the discharge of official duties approved by the board. The board shall, by
promulgation of administrative regulations, set the amount of the per diem.
(12) The board may utilize the Attorney General's pool of hearing officers in accordance with KRS 13B.030.
However, if the Attorney General's office cannot provide a hearing officer, the board may employ or
contract with a hearing officer of its choice.
(13) With the approval of the board, the executive director may hire additional officers and other personnel
necessary for the proper functioning of the board, fix their salaries, and prescribe their duties. Any person
employed under this section shall not be subject to the provisions of KRS Chapter 18A.
Section 6. KRS 327.040 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board shall:
(a) Administer and enforce this chapter and set and evaluate the qualifications of applicants for
licensure and for provisional licenses; and
(b) Promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to:
1. Effectively carry out and enforce the provisions of this chapter, including the regulation of
physical therapists, physical therapist assistants, and the use of supportive personnel; and
2. Establish the fee amounts for all fees required by this chapter and the fees for services
provided by the board, which shall not exceed amounts necessary to generate sufficient funds
to effectively carry out and enforce the provisions of this chapter, including the costs set forth
in subsection (3) of Section 13 of this Act[It shall be the duty of the State Board of Physical
Therapy to receive applications from persons desiring to become physical therapists and to
determine whether said applicants meet the qualifications and standards required by this chapter
of all physical therapists. The board shall also be charged with enforcement of the provisions of
this chapter].
(2) The board is an agency of state government with the power to institute criminal proceedings in the name of the
Commonwealth against violators of this chapter, and to institute civil proceedings to enjoin any violation of
this chapter. The board shall investigate every alleged violation of this chapter coming to its notice by the
complaint procedure set forth in administrative regulations promulgated by the board, and shall take action

CHAPTER 36 5
as it may deem appropriate. It shall be the duty of the Attorney General, the Commonwealth's attorneys, and
the county attorneys to assist the board in prosecuting all violations of this chapter.
(3) The board shall meet at least once each quarter at such place in this state as may be selected by the board. Four
(4) members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. All meetings shall be held
at the call of the board chair[chairman] or at a call of a quorum of members upon not less than ten (10) days'
written notice, unless notice shall be waived. The presence of any member at any meeting of the board shall
constitute a waiver of notice thereof by the member.
(4) The board may conduct investigations and schedule and conduct administrative hearings in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13B, to enforce the provisions of this chapter or administrative regulations promulgated pursuant
to this chapter. The board may[shall have the authority to] administer oaths, receive evidence, interview
persons, issue subpoenas, and require the production of books, papers, documents, or other evidence. In case
of disobedience to a subpoena, the board may invoke the aid of the Franklin Circuit Court. Any order or
subpoena of the court requiring the attendance or testimony of witnesses or the production of documentary
evidence may be enforced and shall be valid anywhere in the Commonwealth.
(5) The board shall keep minutes[a minute book] containing a record of all meetings of the board.
(6) The board shall maintain an electronic record[a register] of all persons licensed [or certified ]under this
chapter. This record[register] shall show the name of every licensee [or certificate holder ]in this state, the
licensee's[his] current business or[and] residence address and telephone numbers, email address, and the date
and number of the licensee's[his] license[ or certificate]. A licensee [or certificate holder ]shall notify the
board of a change of name, address, email address, or telephone number, within thirty (30) days of the change.
(7) [The board's records shall be updated annually.
(8) ]The board shall [publish annually and ]make available[,] a current directory of all licensed physical therapists
and [certified ]physical therapist[therapists'] assistants.
(8)[(9)] The board shall adopt a seal which shall be affixed to every license [and certificate ]granted by it.
(9)[(10)] The board may promulgate administrative regulations establishing a measure of continued competency
as a condition of license renewal.[
(11) The board may promulgate and enforce reasonable administrative regulations for the effectuation of the
purposes of this chapter pursuant to the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A.]
(10)[(12)] The board shall promulgate by administrative regulation a code of ethical standards and standards of
practice.
(11) The board may issue advisory opinions and declaratory rulings related to this chapter and the
administrative regulations promulgated thereunder as established by administrative regulations.
(12)[(13)] The board may[shall have the right to] regulate physical therapist[therapists'] assistants and may
promulgate reasonable administrative regulations regarding licensure[certification], limitations of activities,
supervision, and educational qualifications for physical therapist[therapists'] assistants. The board may
establish reasonable fees for the licensure[certification], renewal, and endorsement of physical
therapist[therapists'] assistants. The fees shall not exceed corresponding fees for physical therapists.
(13) (a)[(14)] The board shall promulgate administrative regulations governing the physical and mental
examination of physical therapists, physical therapist[therapists'] assistants, or applicants, who may be
impaired by reason of a mental, physical, or other condition that impedes their ability to practice
competently.
(b) For purposes of enforcing this subsection and carrying out other duties prescribed in this
chapter[section], the board shall have the power to order an immediate temporary suspension in
accordance with KRS 13B.125 if there is a reasonable cause to believe that a physical therapist,
physical therapist[therapist's] assistant, or applicant may be impaired by reason of a mental, physical, or
other condition or presents an immediate danger to the health, welfare, or safety of the public[ that
impedes his or her ability to practice competently].
(14) The board may convene committees and task forces to review and advise the board on pertinent issues of
public protection of the practice of physical therapy in the Commonwealth.
Section 7. KRS 327.045 is amended to read as follows:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(1) The board shall establish an impaired physical therapy practitioners committee to promote the early
identification, intervention, treatment, and rehabilitation of physical therapists and physical
therapist[therapists'] assistants who may be impaired by reason of illness or of alcohol or drug abuse, or as a
result of any physical or mental condition.
(2) The board may enter into a contractual agreement with a nonprofit corporation, physical therapy professional
organization, or similar organization for the purpose of creating, supporting, and maintaining an impaired
physical therapy practitioners committee.
(3) The board may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to effectuate and
implement a committee formed by the provisions of this section.
(4) [Beginning January 1, 2001, ]The board shall collect an assessment fee[ not to exceed twenty dollars ($20)]
per licensee[ or certificate holder], payable to the board, to be added to each licensure [and certification
]renewal application fee. Proceeds from the assessment shall be expended on the operation of an impaired
physical therapy practitioners committee formed by the provisions of this section. The fee shall be set by the
promulgation of administrative regulations.
(5) Members of an impaired physical therapy practitioners committee, any administrator, staff member,
consultant, agent, volunteer, or employee of the committee acting within the scope of their duties and without
actual malice, and all other persons who furnish information to the committee in good faith and without actual
malice shall not be liable for any claim or damages as a result of any statement, decision, opinion,
investigation, or action taken by the committee or by an individual member of the committee.
(6) All information, interviews, reports, statements, memoranda, or other documents furnished to or produced by
the impaired physical therapy practitioners committee, all communication to or from the committee, and all
proceedings, findings, and conclusions of the committee, including those relating to intervention, treatment, or
rehabilitation, which in any way pertain or refer to a physical therapist or physical therapist[therapist's]
assistant who is or may be impaired, shall be privileged and confidential.
(7) All records and proceedings of the committee that pertain or refer to a licensee[ or a certificate holder] who
may be, or actually is, impaired shall be privileged and confidential and shall be used by the committee and its
members only in the exercise of the proper function of the committee and shall not be considered public
records and shall not be subject to court subpoena and subject to discovery or introduction as evidence in any
civil, criminal, or administrative proceedings except as described in subsection (8) of this section.
(8) The committee may disclose information relative to an impaired physical therapist or physical
therapist[therapist's] assistant only when:
(a) It is essential to disclose the information to persons or organizations needing the information in order to
address the intervention, treatment, or rehabilitation needs of the impaired practitioner;
(b) Its release is authorized in writing by the impaired physical therapist or physical therapist[therapist's]
assistant; or
(c) The information is subject to court order or the disclosure is otherwise authorized by law.
(9) The impaired physical therapy practitioners committee shall make an annual report to the board.
Section 8. KRS 327.050 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Before the board may issue a license to a physical therapist applicant or a physical therapist assistant
applicant[applying for licensure by the board as a physical therapist], the applicant[a person] shall have
successfully completed an accredited program in physical therapy approved by the board. No school shall be
approved by the board unless it has been approved for the educational preparation of physical therapists or
physical therapist assistants by the recognized national accrediting agency for physical therapy educational
programs.
(2) Any person who possesses the qualifications required by this chapter and who desires to apply for licensure as
a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant in Kentucky shall make written application to the board, on
forms to be provided by the board. The application shall be accompanied by a nonrefundable application fee in
an amount to be determined by the board[, but not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250)].
(3) If it appears from the application that the applicant possesses the qualifications required by this chapter and
has not yet successfully completed the board-approved examination, the applicant shall be allowed to sit for
the examination and tested in the subjects the board may determine to be necessary.

CHAPTER 36 7
(4) Examinations shall be held within the state at least once a year at the time and place as the board shall
determine.
(5) An applicant who is admitted to the examination or an applicant who has submitted satisfactory evidence that
the applicant[he] has been accepted as a candidate for licensure by examination in a state which offers an
examination approved by the board may be granted a provisional license[temporary permit] which shall be
valid until the applicant's[his] examination is graded and the applicant[he] is notified by the board of the
applicant's[his] score. The board may summarily withdraw a provisional license[temporary permit] upon
determination that the person has made any false statement to the board on the application, or the person fails
to pass an examination approved by the board.
(6) An applicant who receives a passing score as determined by the board and who meets the other qualifications
required by this chapter shall be licensed as a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant.
(7) An applicant who fails to receive a passing score on the[his] examination shall not be licensed, but the board
may, by administrative regulation, permit applicants to take the examination more than once.
(8) All licenses[ and certificates] shall be renewed biennially[,] upon payment on or before March 31 of each odd-
numbered[uneven-numbered] year of a renewal fee in an amount to be promulgated by the board by
administrative regulations.
(9) Licenses[ and certificates] which are not renewed by March 31 of each odd-numbered[uneven-numbered] year
shall lapse.[
(10) This chapter shall not be construed to affect or prevent:
(a) A student of physical therapy from engaging in clinical practice under the supervision of a licensed
physical therapist, as part of the student's educational program;
(b) A physical therapist who is licensed to practice in another state or country from conducting or
participating in a clinical residency under the supervision of a physical therapist licensed in Kentucky
and for a period of not more than ninety (90) days;
(c) A physical therapist who is licensed to practice in another state or country from conducting or
participating in the teaching of physical therapy in connection with an educational program and for a
period of not more than ninety (90) days;
(d) A physical therapist licensed in another state or country from performing therapy on members of the
out-of-state sports or entertainment group they accompany to Kentucky; or
(e) The practice of chiropractic as defined in KRS 312.015(3).]
Section 9. KRS 327.060 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board shall issue a license to:
(a) An individual who holds a valid license from another state, who meets requirements specified in KRS
327.050 and who has no imposed or pending disciplinary actions.
(b) An individual who has been educated as a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant outside the
United States and who has:
1. Completed the application process;
2. Provided satisfactory evidence to the board that his or her education is substantially equivalent to
the requirements for physical therapists or physical therapist assistants educated in United
States accredited educational programs;
3. Provided written proof that the school of physical therapy education outside the United States is
recognized by its own ministry of education;
4. Successfully completed the examinations provided for in KRS 327.050;
5. Passed the board-approved English language proficiency examinations if English is not the
applicant's[his or her] native language;
6. Successfully completed, prior to licensure, a board-approved, supervised practice period of not
less than three (3) months nor more than six (6) months, under the direct supervision of a
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

8 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
physical therapist who holds an unrestricted[ Kentucky] license. This requirement may be
satisfied by at least three (3) months of supervised practice as a physical therapist in a state with
license requirements comparable to or more stringent than those of Kentucky;
7. Provided proof of legal authorization to reside and seek employment in the United States or its
territories;
8. Provided proof of authorization to practice as a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant
without limitations in the country where the professional education occurred;
9. Submitted to a prescreening process by an agency approved by the board; and
10. Submitted educational credentials to the board for evaluation by an agency approved by the
board.
(2) The board may approve an agency to prescreen applicants for initial licensure under this section.
(3) The board may approve one (1) or more services to provide an evaluation of the applicant's educational
credentials for board approval for licensing under this section.
(4) The board may waive the requirements of subsection (1)(b) 3., 9., and 10. of this section if the applicant is a
graduate of a professional physical therapy education program preapproved by the board.
(5) The board may waive the requirements of subsection (1)(b)6. of this section for an applicant for
credentialing by endorsement pursuant to administrative regulations of the board.
Section 10. KRS 327.070 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board, after due notice and an opportunity for an administrative hearing conducted in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13B, may take [any ]one (1) or a combination of the following actions against any licensee,
licensee of another member state as defined in KRS 327.300[certificate holder], or applicant:
(a) Refuse to license[ or certify] any applicant;
(b) Refuse to renew the license[ or certificate] of any person;
(c) Permanently revoke, suspend,[Suspend or revoke] or place on probation the license[ or certificate] of
any person;
(d) Impose restrictions on the scope of practice of any person;
(e) Issue an administrative reprimand to any person; and
(f) Issue a private admonishment to any person[; and
(g) Impose fines for violations of this chapter not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500)].
(2) The following acts by a licensee, licensee of another member state as defined in KRS 327.300[certificate
holder], or applicant may be considered cause for disciplinary action:
(a) Indulgence in excessive use of alcoholic beverages or abusive use of controlled substances;
(b) Engaging in, permitting, or attempting to engage in or permit the performance of substandard patient
care by himself or by persons working under his supervision due to a deliberate or negligent act or
failure to act, regardless of whether actual injury to the patient is established;
(c) 1. Having engaged in or attempted to engage in sexual contact as defined in KRS 510.010,
whether consensual or nonconsensual, with any active patient of record, or with the parent or
legal guardian of an active patient of record, unless a consensual sexual relationship exists
between, and predated, the patient and therapist relationship; or
2. Requesting sexual favors or physical contact of a sexual nature unless a prior consensual
sexual relationship exists with any active patient of record of the physical therapist or physical
therapist assistant[Having engaged in or attempted to engage in a course of lewd or immoral
conduct with any person:
1. While that person is a patient of a health care facility defined by KRS 216B.015 where the
physical therapist or physical therapist's assistant provides physical therapy services; or
2. While that person is a patient or client of the physical therapist or physical therapist's assistant];

CHAPTER 36 9
(d) Having sexual contact, as defined by KRS 510.010(7), without the consent of both parties, with any
individual[an employee or coworker of the licensee or certificate holder];
(e) Sexually harassing any individual[an employee or coworker of the licensee or certificate holder];
(f) Conviction of a felony or misdemeanor in the courts of this state or any other state, territory, or country
which impedes a person's[affects his] ability[ to continue] to practice competently and safely on the
public, if in accordance with KRS Chapter 335B. "Conviction," as used in this paragraph, shall include
a deferred conviction, deferred prosecution, deferred sentence, finding or verdict of guilt, an Alford
plea, an admission of guilt, or a plea of nolo contendere;
(g) Obtaining or attempting to obtain a license [or certificate ]by fraud or material misrepresentation or
making any other false statement to the board;
(h) Engaging in fraud or material deception in the delivery of professional services, including
reimbursement, or advertising services in a false or misleading manner;
(i) Evidence of gross negligence or gross incompetence in his practice of physical therapy;
(j) Documentation of being declared mentally disabled by a court of competent jurisdiction and not
thereafter having had his rights restored;
(k) Failing or refusing to obey any lawful order or administrative regulation of the board;
(l) Promoting for personal gain an unnecessary device, treatment, procedure, or service, or directing or
requiring a patient to purchase a device, treatment, procedure, or service from a facility or business in
which he has a financial interest;
(m) Being impaired by reason of a mental, physical, or other condition that impedes his or her ability to
practice competently;
(n) Having had a license revoked or suspended, other disciplinary action taken, or an application for
licensure refused, revoked, or suspended by the proper authorities of another state, territory, or
country;
(o) Interfering with an investigation or disciplinary proceeding by failure to cooperate, by willful
misrepresentation of facts, or by the use of threats or harassment against any patient or witness to
prevent that patient or witness from providing evidence in a disciplinary proceeding or any legal
action;
(p) Failing to maintain patient confidentiality without documented authorization of the patient or
authorized decision maker, or unless otherwise required by law;
(q) Engaging, or attempting to engage, in conduct that subverts or undermines the integrity of the
licensure examination process;
(r)[(n)] Violation of KRS 304.39-215; and
(s)[(o)] Conduct that is subject to the penalties under KRS 304.99-060(4) or (5).
(3) A private admonishment shall not:
(a) Be subject to disclosure to the public under KRS 61.878(1)(l);[. A private admonishment shall not ]
(b) Constitute disciplinary action, but may be used by the board for statistical purposes or in subsequent
disciplinary action against the same licensee[, certificate holder,] or applicant; or
(c) Be admissible in any proceeding under KRS Chapter 13B, except as provided in paragraph (b) of this
subsection.
(4) (a) The board shall develop specific guidelines through the promulgation of administrative regulations
in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to follow upon receipt of an allegation of sexual misconduct by
a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant licensed by the board or granted a compact
privilege under KRS 327.300.
(b) The guidelines shall include investigation, inquiry, and hearing procedures which ensure that the
process does not revictimize the alleged victim or cause harm if a physical therapist or physical
therapist assistant is falsely accused.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

10 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(5) The board, staff, and investigators may receive periodic education on pertinent issues, including but not
limited to topics affecting the practice of physical therapy and public protection.
(6) (a) The board may, by administrative regulation promulgated in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A,
establish which disciplinary action records may be expunged.
(b) Any records that are expunged shall be exempt from disclosure under the Kentucky Open Records
Act, KRS 61.870 to 61.884.
(c) The board shall not report expunged disciplinary actions for any purpose other than statistical.
SECTION 11. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 327 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The board shall establish the amounts, limits, or ranges for any fines imposed under this chapter through
the promulgation of administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A and shall fine any
person who:
(a) Violates or aids in the violation of Section 3, 4, 8, or 9 of this Act for practicing or for performing
services without a license required by the board;
(b) Is issued a notice of violation by the board for failure to comply with this chapter or administrative
regulations promulgated under this chapter;
(c) Exercises or attempts to exercise control over, interferes with, or attempts to influence the
professional judgment of a licensee in any manner, including through coercion, collusion, extortion,
inducement, or intimidation;
(d) 1. Violates any ruling of the board or hinders any agent of the board in carrying out the duties
assigned to the agent;
2. Is an officer who refuses to enforce the provisions of this chapter when called upon by the
board to do so; or
3. Attempts in any way to hinder or obstruct the board in carrying out the provisions of this
chapter; or
(e) Willfully refuses to obey its lawful orders and resists, obstructs, interferes with, threatens, attempts to
intimidate, or in any other manner interferes with an agent of the board.
(2) Each day or part of a day that a violation continues is a separate violation and subject to daily penalties.
(3) For any violation of this chapter, in addition to any other fines designated in this section, the board may
impose on any person fines in an amount equal to the cost of investigative and legal fees incurred by the
board in processing the case.
(4) The board may seek an injunction in the Circuit Court of the county in which the alleged violation occurred
against any individual who practices physical therapy without a license issued by the board under this
chapter or a compact privilege granted under KRS 327.300.
Section 12. KRS 327.075 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board may reinstate within three (3) years a license[ or certificate] which has lapsed[,] upon payment of
the prescribed renewal fee and, in addition, the payment of a reinstatement fee to be promulgated by the board
by administrative regulations.
(2) The board may reinstate a license[ or certificate] which has been lapsed for more than three (3) years[,] upon a
showing that the applicant is able to practice with reasonable competency. In determining competency, the
board may require the applicant to successfully complete additional requirements established by the board by
promulgation of an administrative regulation in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A[all or any part of the
required examination].
(3) The board may reinstate a license which has been suspended or revoked under provisions of this chapter if,
after a hearing conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B, the board determines the applicant is able to
practice the profession with reasonable competency and is able to maintain the ethical code and standards of
practice promulgated by administrative regulation. As a condition of reinstatement, the board may impose
reasonable restrictions under which the licensee[ or certificate holder] shall practice.
(4) Any person aggrieved by a final order of the board denying, suspending, or revoking that person's[his]
license[ or certificate] may appeal to the Franklin Circuit Court in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

CHAPTER 36 11
SECTION 13. KRS 327.080 IS REPEALED AND REENACTED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) All fees and other moneys received by the board pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the State
Treasury to the credit of a revolving fund for the use of the board.
(2) (a) No part of this revolving fund shall revert to the general fund of this Commonwealth.
(b) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, fund amounts not expended at the close of a fiscal year shall not lapse
but shall be carried forward into the next fiscal year.
(3) All expenses incurred by the board shall be paid from this revolving fund, including:
(a) The compensation of members of the board;
(b) Salaries, wages, and benefits of the employees of the board;
(c) Payment of contractors hired by the board;
(d) Administrative services provided to the board;
(e) Investigative and legal services;
(f) Court costs;
(g) Technology expenses related to administration of this chapter; and
(h) All other expenses incurred by the board.
Section 14. KRS 327.200 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A treating physical therapist or physical therapist assistant who provides or facilitates the use of telehealth
shall ensure:
(a) That the informed consent of the patient, or another appropriate person with authority to make the
health care treatment decision for the patient, is obtained before services are provided through
telehealth; and
(b) That the confidentiality of the patient's medical information is maintained as required by this chapter
and other applicable law. At a minimum, confidentiality shall be maintained through appropriate
processes, practices, and technology as designated by the board and that conform to applicable federal
law.
(2) The board shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to implement this
section and as necessary to:
(a) Prevent abuse and fraud through the use of telehealth services;
(b) Prevent fee-splitting through the use of telehealth services; and
(c) Utilize telehealth in the provision of physical therapy and in the provision of continuing education.
(3) For purposes of this section, "telehealth" means the use of interactive audio, video, or other electronic media to
deliver health care. It includes the use of electronic media for physical therapy diagnosis, consultation,
treatment, transfer of health or medical data, and continuing education.
Section 15. KRS 327.310 is amended to read as follows:
The Board of Physical Therapy established in KRS 327.030 shall require a national and state criminal background
investigation for every applicant seeking a license[, certificate,] or provisional license[temporary permit] issued by
the board permitting the applicant to engage in a profession authorized by the board. The criminal background
investigation shall be by means of a fingerprint check by the Department of Kentucky State Police and Federal
Bureau of Investigation, pursuant to the following requirements:
(1) The applicant shall provide the applicant's[his or her] fingerprints to the Department of Kentucky State Police
for submission to the Federal Bureau of Investigation after a state criminal background check is conducted;
(2) The results of the national and state criminal background check shall be sent to the board for the screening of
applicants;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

12 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(3) The board shall be prohibited from releasing any criminal history record information to any private entity or
other licensing board, or authorizing receipt by such entity or board; and
(4) Any fee charged by the Department of Kentucky State Police or the Federal Bureau of Investigation shall be
an amount no greater than the actual cost of processing the request and conducting the background check. The
board may charge this fee to the applicant for licensure[ or certification].
Signed by Governor April 7, 2026.